Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.440

Assistance for persons with disabilities present at scene of emergency—Assessment and report—Definitions.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the director, through the state 911 coordinator, and in collaboration with the department of health, the department of social and health services, the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington council of police and sheriffs, the state fire marshal's office, a representative of a first responder organization with experience in addressing the needs of a person with a disability, and other individuals and entities at the discretion of the director, must assess, and report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018, regarding:

(a) The resources, capabilities, techniques, protocols, and procedures available or required in order to include as part of the enhanced 911 emergency service the ability to allow an immediate display on the screen indicating that a person with a disability may be present at the scene of an emergency, the caller's identification, location, phone number, address, and if made available, additional information on the person with a disability that would assist the first responder in the emergency response;

(b) How best to acquire, implement, and safeguard a secure website and the information in the system provided by a person with a disability, or a parent, guardian, or caretaker of a person with a disability in order to make such information directly available to first responders at the scene of an emergency or on the way to the scene of an emergency;

(c) What information provided by a person must remain confidential under state or federal law, or otherwise should remain confidential without written permission to release it for purposes of chapter 295, Laws of 2017 or the information is otherwise releasable or available under other provisions of law; and

(d) The need to provide various agencies and employees that are first responders and emergency personnel immunity from civil liability for acts or omissions in the performance of their duties, and what standard should apply, such as if the act or omission is the result of simple negligence, gross negligence, or willful misconduct.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Both "accident" and "emergency" mean an unforeseen combination of circumstances or a resulting situation that results in a need for assistance or relief and calls for immediate action; and

(b) "Person with a disability" means an individual who has been diagnosed medically to have a physical, mental, emotional, intellectual, behavioral, developmental, or sensory disability.

[ 2022 c 203 s 4; 2017 c 295 s 3.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Short title—2017 c 295: See note following RCW 43.70.490.